dev/noun/noun.ne.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- माया; माया; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माया__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महिला; महिला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="महिला__n_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भाषा; भाषा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भाषा__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सेवा; सेवा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सेवा__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राष्ट्र; राष्ट्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राष्ट्र__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिद्धान्त; सिद्धान्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सिद्धान्त__n_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गीत; गीत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गीत__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पुस्तक; पुस्तक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पुस्तक__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वन; वन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वन__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सैनिक; सैनिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सैनिक__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हात; हात; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हात__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- श्री; श्री; 1 -->
    <pardef n="श्री__np_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अध्यक्ष; अध्यक्ष; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अध्यक्ष__n_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शरीर; शरीर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शरीर__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अधिकार; अधिकार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अधिकार__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शहर; शहर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शहर__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विषय; विषय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विषय__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पानी; पानी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पानी__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- व्यवहार; व्यवहार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="व्यवहार__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आँखा; आँखा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आँखा__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कवि; कवि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कवि__n_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नागरिक; नागरिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नागरिक__n_mf_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रात; रात; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रात__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ढोका; ढोका; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ढोका__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रहरी; प्रहरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रहरी__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नेता; नेता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नेता__n_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ध्यान; ध्यान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ध्यान__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साहित्य; साहित्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साहित्य__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सदस्य; सदस्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सदस्य__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कुरो; कुरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कुरो__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वर्ष; वर्ष; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वर्ष__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काङ्ग्रेस; काङ्ग्रेस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काङ्ग्रेस__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शिक्षा; शिक्षा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शिक्षा__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कम्पनी; कम्पनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कम्पनी__n_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दृष्टि; दृष्टि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दृष्टि__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- डाक्टर; डाक्टर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="डाक्टर__n_mf_a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="a"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दुःख; दुःख; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दुःख__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काम; काम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काम__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="माया"><i>माया</i><par n="माया__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="महिला"><i>महिला</i><par n="महिला__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="भाषा"><i>भाषा</i><par n="भाषा__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="सेवा"><i>सेवा</i><par n="सेवा__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="राष्ट्र"><i>राष्ट्र</i><par n="राष्ट्र__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सिद्धान्त"><i>सिद्धान्त</i><par n="सिद्धान्त__n_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="गीत"><i>गीत</i><par n="गीत__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="पुस्तक"><i>पुस्तक</i><par n="पुस्तक__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="वन"><i>वन</i><par n="वन__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सैनिक"><i>सैनिक</i><par n="सैनिक__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="हात"><i>हात</i><par n="हात__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="श्री"><i>श्री</i><par n="श्री__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अध्यक्ष"><i>अध्यक्ष</i><par n="अध्यक्ष__n_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="शरीर"><i>शरीर</i><par n="शरीर__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="अधिकार"><i>अधिकार</i><par n="अधिकार__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शहर"><i>शहर</i><par n="शहर__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="विषय"><i>विषय</i><par n="विषय__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="पानी"><i>पानी</i><par n="पानी__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="व्यवहार"><i>व्यवहार</i><par n="व्यवहार__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="आँखा"><i>आँखा</i><par n="आँखा__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="कवि"><i>कवि</i><par n="कवि__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="नागरिक"><i>नागरिक</i><par n="नागरिक__n_mf_an"/></e>
    <e lm="रात"><i>रात</i><par n="रात__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ढोका"><i>ढोका</i><par n="ढोका__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रहरी"><i>प्रहरी</i><par n="प्रहरी__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="नेता"><i>नेता</i><par n="नेता__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ध्यान"><i>ध्यान</i><par n="ध्यान__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="साहित्य"><i>साहित्य</i><par n="साहित्य__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सदस्य"><i>सदस्य</i><par n="सदस्य__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="कुरो"><i>कुरो</i><par n="कुरो__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="वर्ष"><i>वर्ष</i><par n="वर्ष__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="काङ्ग्रेस"><i>काङ्ग्रेस</i><par n="काङ्ग्रेस__np"/></e>
    <e lm="शिक्षा"><i>शिक्षा</i><par n="शिक्षा__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="कम्पनी"><i>कम्पनी</i><par n="कम्पनी__n_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="दृष्टि"><i>दृष्टि</i><par n="दृष्टि__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="डाक्टर"><i>डाक्टर</i><par n="डाक्टर__n_mf_a"/></e>
    <e lm="दुःख"><i>दुःख</i><par n="दुःख__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="काम"><i>काम</i><par n="काम__n_nt_nn"/></e>
